Utah statutes.
17-37-7.   Annual report -- Financial statement.
To the extent that independent accounting records are prepared and maintained
by the planetarium, the planetarium board of directors shall make, or in the
case of a contracting entity, require that there be made, an annual report to
the county executive and the county legislative body on the condition and
operation of the planetarium, including a financial statement.  The financial
statement shall be prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles consistently applied and shall be reviewed by the county auditor.
The planetarium shall be included in the annual audit of the county conducted
by an independent public accountant as required by Title 51, Chapter 2a,
Accounting Reports from Political Subdivisions, Interlocal Organizations, and
Other Local Entities Act.
